Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Article 2. Impounding Generally; Proceedings

§ 3411.
Right to impound.

A person may impound an animal found in his or her enclosure doing damage.

§ 3412.
Poundkeeper’s duties and liabilities.

The poundkeeper shall supply such animal with food and drink while in the pound, and such keeper shall be liable to pay the owner of such animal damages occasioned by neglecting so to do.

§ 3413.
Notice by impounder.

The person impounding such animal, within 24 hours thereafter, shall give notice thereof to the owner or person having the care of such animal, either personally or by a written notice left at his or her dwelling house.
Such notice shall require such owner or keeper to appear at the dwelling house of the impounder within 24 hours to appoint appraisers to fix the damage done by such animal.

Form of notice.

When personal notice was given, it could be given by an agent of the impounder if the owner actually had notice and received it as coming from impounder. Moore v. Robbins, 7 Vt. 363, 1835 Vt. LEXIS 55 (1835); Hooper v. Kittredge, 16 Vt. 677, 1844 Vt. LEXIS 158 (1844).

§ 3414.
Liability for failure to give notice.

If a person so impounding an animal does not give such notice, he or she shall forfeit to such owner or keeper $0.50 for every 24 hours’ neglect so to do, and shall pay the damages that such owner or keeper sustains in consequence thereof, to be recovered with costs in a civil action.

§ 3415.
Appraisers of damages.

If the owner or keeper appears, he or she may appoint one person and the impounder another to appraise such damage.
If such appraisers do not agree, they may appoint a third.

§ 3416.
Ascertainment of damages; discharge on payment.

The appraisers shall ascertain the damages done by the animal, and make a certificate of the amount of damages, and promptly transmit the certificate to the poundkeeper. An impounded animal shall not be discharged until the damages, charges, and costs are paid, nor shall an animal be detained after payment is made.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 194.

§ 3417.
Application to Superior judge.

If the owner or keeper of an animal impounded does not appear, or does not appoint an appraiser, or if the appraisers appointed by the parties do not agree upon a third person, the impounder may apply to a Superior judge who by law can judge between the parties in civil causes, who shall appoint one or more appraisers, as the case requires.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. Feb. 1, 1967;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 74, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 3418.
Forfeiture for failure to replevy or redeem.

If the owner or keeper of an animal impounded does not, within 48 hours after notice of the impoundment pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, either replevy or redeem the animal, he or she shall be liable to the poundkeeper for $3.00 for each animal left in pound, plus an additional $3.00 for each additional day the animal is left in pound. The poundkeeper may recover the amount in a civil action.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2021, No. 20

, § 195.

§ 3419.
Sale of animals.

If the owner or keeper of an animal impounded does not, within 48 hours after notice thereof, replevy or redeem the same, the impounder may advertise and sell the animal, as provided when the owner is unknown.

§ 3420.
Procedure when owner unknown.

If the owner of an animal taken in an enclosure, doing damage and impounded, is unknown, the impounder shall, within 48 hours, post an advertisement in some public place in the town in which the animal was impounded, and in two adjoining towns, describing such animal and stating the time when and place where the same was impounded.

§ 3421.
Payment of damages and charges or sale of animals.

If the owner, within 30 days after the posting of such advertisement, appears and claims the animal, he or she may receive the same on paying the damages done by it and the charges of impounding, keeping, and advertising.
If the owner does not appear within the time and claim such animal, the impounder may sell the same at public auction, after six days’ notice posted in some public place in the town.

§ 3422.
Proceeds of sale.

The avails of the sale shall be applied to the payment of the damages done by the animal, to be ascertained by the fence viewers, and the expense of impounding, keeping, advertising, ascertaining the damages done, town clerk’s fees, and selling the animal.
The balance shall be paid to the treasurer of the town in which the animal was impounded, to the use of the owner, if demanded within one year, otherwise to the use of the town.

§ 3423.
Record of sale.

Immediately after the sale, the impounder shall cause a description of the animal, with an account of the associated damages, charges, and expenses pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, and the sum for which it was sold, to be recorded in the office of the clerk of the town.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 196.